Missouri, session 2026, HB2019.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
There is appropriated out of the State Treasury, to be expended only as provided in
Article IV, Section 28 of the Constitution of Missouri, for the purpose of funding each
department, division, agency, and program described herein for the item or items stated, and
for no other purpose whatsoever, chargeable to the fund designated for the period beginning
July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows:
Section 19.001. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For repairs and renovations to a sheltered workshop in a city with more
than four thousand four hundred but fewer than four thousand
nine hundred inhabitants and located in a county with more than
fourteen thousand but fewer than fifteen thousand seven hundred
inhabitants and with a county seat with more than four thousand
five hundred fifty but fewer than four thousand nine hundred
inhabitants, provided there is a local match

SS SCS HCS HB 2019 2
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$250,000
Section 19.002. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For building renovations for a technology center in a city with more than
sixteen thousand but fewer than eighteen thousand inhabitants
and partially located in a county with more than thirty-five
thousand but fewer than forty thousand inhabitants, for the
purpose of expanding culinary arts and early childhood education
programs
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,500,000
Section 19.003. To the Department of Elementary and Secondary
Education
For the Office of Childhood
For building renovations for a not-for-profit organization early childhood
center located in a county with more than forty thousand but
fewer than fifty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with
more than eighteen thousand but fewer than twenty-one thousand
inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$3,500,000
Section 19.005. To the Department of Natural Resources
For the Division of State Parks
For state park and historic site capital improvement expenditures,
including design, construction, renovation, maintenance, repairs,
replacements, improvements, adjacent land purchases,
installation and replacement of interpretive exhibits, water and
wastewater improvements, maintenance and repair to existing
roadways, parking areas, and trails, acquisition, restoration, and
marketing of endangered historic properties, and expenditure of
recoupments, donations, and grants
From Department of Natural Resources Federal Fund (1140) ..................................$2,000,000
From State Park Earnings Fund (1415) .......................................................................1,750,000
From Parks Sales Tax Fund (1613) ..................................................................... 3,000,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$6,750,000
Section 19.006. To the Department of Natural Resources

SS SCS HCS HB 2019 3
For water infrastructure improvements, including water line
replacement, in a city with more than one thousand nine hundred
but fewer than two thousand one hundred fifty inhabitants and
located in a county with more than fifty thousand but fewer than
sixty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than
twelve thousand six hundred but fewer than fifteen thousand
inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$500,000
Section 19.007. To the Department of Economic Development
For construction and renovation of wastewater, stormwater, and water
infrastructure to support new connections and upgrades to
existing sanitary sewer, storm drainage, and potable water
systems and other economic development and infrastructure
improvements
From OA I-70 Project Fund (1334) .........................................................................$80,000,000
Section 19.008. To the Department of Natural Resources
For water infrastructure improvements and stormwater upgrades,
including design, engineering, construction, in any city with more
than four thousand four hundred but fewer than four thousand
nine hundred inhabitants and located in a county with more than
sixty thousand but fewer than seventy thousand inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$454,000
Section 19.009. To the Department of Natural Resources
For well drilling and water tower construction, upgrades and
improvements, in any city with more than four thousand four
hundred but fewer than four thousand nine hundred inhabitants
and located in a county with more than fifty thousand but fewer
than sixty thousand inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$3,000,000
Section 19.010. To the Department of Conservation
For stream access acquisition and development; lake site acquisition and
development; financial assistance to other public agencies or in
partnership with other public agencies; land acquisition for
upland wildlife, state forests, wetlands, and natural areas and
additions to existing areas; for major improvements and repairs
(including materials, supplies, and labor) to buildings, roads,

SS SCS HCS HB 2019 4
hatcheries, and other departmental structures; and for soil
conservation activities, erosion control, and land improvement on
department land
From Conservation Commission Fund (1609) ........................................................$37,200,000
Section 19.011. To the Department of Conservation
For the planning, design, maintenance, repair, and upgrades to a road in
a county with more than twenty-two thousand but fewer than
twenty-five thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with
more than one thousand nine hundred but fewer than two
thousand three hundred inhabitants and a county with more than
forty thousand but fewer than fifty thousand inhabitants and with
a county seat with more than eighteen thousand but fewer than
twenty-one thousand inhabitants, to provide access to a state-
operated nursery
From Conservation Commission Fund (1609) ..........................................................$3,000,000
Section 19.012. To the Department of Economic Development
For the planning, design, construction and/or renovation, and project
management of a comprehensive redevelopment project in the
historic commercial district in a city with more than thirty-six
thousand five hundred but fewer than forty thousand inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$4,000,000
Section 19.013. To the Department of Social Services
For a not-for-profit organization located in a county with more than
seven hundred thousand but fewer than eight hundred thousand
inhabitants that provides lodging, respite, and lifeline services to
families of critically ill children across Missouri, provided that
funds be used for the purpose of supporting capital expansion and
renovation, provided there shall be a local match
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,000,000
Section 19.014. To the Department of Social Services
For the planning, design, construction, renovations, maintenance,
repairs, and/or upgrades to a hospital in a county with more than
five thousand but fewer than six thousand inhabitants and with a
county seat with more than one thousand six hundred but fewer
than two thousand six hundred inhabitants

SS SCS HCS HB 2019 5
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$4,000,000
Section 19.015. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Public Safety
For planning, land acquisition, design, construction, maintenance, repair,
and improvements of the Missouri State Highway Patrol
maintenance garage
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) .........................$4,557,900
For planning, land acquisition, design, construction, maintenance, repair,
and improvements of the Missouri State Highway Patrol Troop I
Headquarters
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) .........................12,202,541
For planning, land acquisition, design, construction, maintenance, repair,
and improvements of the Missouri State Highway Patrol
Interoperability storage building
From State Highways and Transportation Department Fund (1644) ................... 884,591
Total .........................................................................................................................$17,645,032
Section 19.016. To the Department of Public Safety
For planning, design, construction, and land acquisition for a joint
wellness center for law enforcement in a city with more than
twenty-seven thousand but fewer than thirty thousand inhabitants
and located in a county with more than one million inhabitants,
provided that there shall be at least a fifty percent (50%) local
match
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$3,000,000
Section 19.017. To the Department of Public Safety
For the Office of the Director
For distribution to a city with more than one hundred thousand but fewer
than one hundred ten thousand inhabitants for the planning,
design, and construction of a tactical and K-9 training facility
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$250,000
Section 19.018. To the Department of Public Safety
For a police department in any county with more than one million
inhabitants that was established in 1955, for strengthening

SS SCS HCS HB 2019 6
regional emergency services, including design, construction,
renovation, maintenance, repairs, replacements and
improvements that will lead to improved efficiency, cost savings
and enhanced service delivery for the communities served,
provided that appropriations shall be matched on a 50/50 basis by
the recipient
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$3,000,000
Section 19.020. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of the National Guard
For design and construction of National Guard facilities statewide
From Adjutant General Federal Fund (1190) ..........................................................$35,000,000
Section 19.021. To the Department of the National Guard
For the planning, design, and construction of installation relocation and
modernization infrastructure, including fuel farm relocation and
security infrastructure improvements, at a joint-use military and
civilian airport located in a county with more than eighty
thousand but fewer than one hundred thousand inhabitants and
with a county seat with more than seventy thousand but fewer
than eighty thousand inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$4,400,000
Section 19.025. To the Department of Social Services
For planning, design, construction, renovation, upgrades, and
improvements at Camp Avery
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$680,040
Section 19.027. To the Office of Administration
For the Department of Economic Development
For improvements at a non-profit science center in a city with more than
one hundred sixty thousand but fewer than two hundred thousand
inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,000,000
Section 19.028. To the Department of Social Services
For the planning, design, and construction of apartment units at the
Elevate Center in a city with more than one hundred sixty
thousand but fewer than two hundred thousand inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$3,500,000

SS SCS HCS HB 2019 7
Section 19.030. To the Missouri State Capitol Commission
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and upgrades of the
Missouri state capitol building
From Missouri State Capitol Commission Capitol Preservation Fund
(1202) .........................................................................................................$104,125,000
Section 19.031. To the Office of Administration
For parking area improvements, including but not limited to resurfacing
and lighting, and additional parking access for recreational
vehicles at the Ozark Empire fairgrounds
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,200,000
Section 19.033. To the Department of Social Services
For a nonprofit organization located in a city not within a county that
builds homes and communities that is dedicated to eliminating
substandard housing in a city not within a county and empowers
local families to build, repair and purchase their own home
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$200,000
Section 19.034. To the Department of Social Services
For a not-for-profit organization located in a city not within a county that
provides children and family services to make repairs on a more
than a century old building, such organization was also awarded
a one million dollar ARPA grant match
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,000,000
Section 19.035. To the Department of Social Services
For the Division of Youth Services
For planning, design, construction, renovation, and land acquisition for
a new youth center in the St. Louis region
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$10,776,055
Section 19.036. To the Department of Social Services
For technology replacements of a linear accelerator for a regional
hospital located within a city with more than four thousand six
hundred but fewer than four thousand nine hundred inhabitants
and partially located in a county with more than forty-two
thousand but fewer than fifty thousand inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$3,000,000

SS SCS HCS HB 2019 8
Section 19.037. To the Department of Social Services
For a nonprofit organization, founded in 1929, located in a city not within
a county that has provided after-school and summer programs to
children and youth in the area, to plan, design, and implement a
new club on a high school campus
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$3,000,000
Section 19.038. To the Department of Social Services
For infrastructure needs for the largest nonprofit youth organization in
the state, serving over a million youth since 1967 located in a city
not within a county, that enables young people to reach their full
potential as productive, caring, responsible citizens by providing
a club experience, including after school and summer programs
that ensures success
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$4,000,000
Section 19.039. To the Department of Social Services
For a not-for-profit hospital that is part of a not-for-profit healthcare
system based in any city with more than sixteen thousand but
fewer than eighteen thousand inhabitants and located in more
than one county provided that funds are used for the purchase of
medical equipment and capital infrastructure improvements for
expansion and renovation of a family medicine medical clinic
that is located in any city with more than one thousand five
hundred but fewer than one thousand seven hundred inhabitants
and located in a county with more than six thousand but fewer
than seven thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more
than four hundred but fewer than one thousand inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,000,000
Section 19.040. To the Lieutenant Governor
For the design, engineering, and construction costs for a museum that
honors General Omar Bradley in a city with more than twelve
thousand five hundred but fewer than fourteen thousand
inhabitants and located in a county with more than twenty-two
thousand but fewer than twenty-five thousand inhabitants and
with a county seat with more than nine hundred but fewer than
one thousand four hundred inhabitants, provided there is a local
match

SS SCS HCS HB 2019 9
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$500,000
Section 19.045. To the Department of Transportation
For the planning, design, maintenance, repair, and upgrades to a road in
any county with more than forty thousand but fewer than fifty
thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than
fourteen thousand but fewer than eighteen thousand inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,780,000
Section 19.046. To the Department of Transportation
For right of way acquisition and utility improvements in any city with
more than one thousand seven hundred but fewer than one
thousand nine hundred inhabitants and located in a county with
more than eight thousand but fewer than eight thousand nine
hundred inhabitants and with a county seat with more than six
hundred seventy but fewer than seven hundred thirty inhabitants
along the intersection of U.S. Highway 19 and U.S. Highway 63
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$220,000
Section 19.047. To the Department of Transportation
For all expenditures associated with the planning, design, maintenance,
repair, and upgrades to U.S. Highway 412
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,000,000
Section 19.048. To the Department of Transportation
For distribution to a city with more than ten thousand but fewer than
eleven thousand inhabitants and that is the county seat of a county
with more than thirty thousand but fewer than thirty-five
thousand inhabitants, for improvements to a road
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,500,000
Section 19.049. To the Department of Transportation
For land acquisition, design, and construction of an overpass over U.S.
Route 60 in a city with more than one thousand seven hundred
but fewer than one thousand nine hundred inhabitants and located
in a county with more than thirty-five thousand but fewer than
forty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than
five thousand but fewer than eight thousand inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$6,400,000

SS SCS HCS HB 2019 10
Section 19.050. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For North Central Missouri College
For an agriculture building
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,000,000
Section 19.051. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For the University of Missouri
For expansion of the University of Missouri – Kansas City dental school
into an existing facility on the campus of Missouri Western State
University, located in a city with more than seventy-one thousand
but fewer than seventy-nine thousand inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$7,000,000
Section 19.052. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For the University of Missouri – Columbia
For an Energy Innovation Center
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,000,000
Section 19.053. To the Department of Agriculture
For the University of Missouri
For a new multi-purpose educational and training facility, located in any
city with more than one hundred but fewer than one hundred
sixteen inhabitants and located in a county with more than three
thousand six hundred but fewer than four thousand inhabitants,
that would allow for regional, statewide, and international
training programs for students, faculty, and industry
professionals in agriculture production, programs, and practical
applications of applied research, provided that local matching
funds must be provided on a 50/50 state/local basis
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$5,000,000
Section 19.054. To the Department of Higher Education and Workforce
Development
For Southeast Missouri State University
For equipment and facilities to expand programs designed to increase
workforce opportunities in the aviation industry
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,500,000

SS SCS HCS HB 2019 11
Section 19.055. To the Department of Economic Development
For distribution to a county with more than fifteen thousand seven
hundred but fewer than seventeen thousand six hundred
inhabitants and with a county seat with more than three thousand
but fewer than three thousand six hundred inhabitants, for a
maintenance and equipment building to be used by county
personnel
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$100,000
Section 19.056. To the Department of Economic Development
For a community center located in any city with more than three thousand
but fewer than three thousand four hundred inhabitants and
located in a county with more than fifteen thousand seven
hundred but fewer than seventeen thousand six hundred
inhabitants and with a county seat with more than three thousand
but fewer than three thousand six hundred inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$200,000
Section 19.057. To the Department of Economic Development
For planning, acquisition, construction, repair and/or renovation and
maintenance, to an industrial development authority in any
county with more than sixty thousand but fewer than seventy
thousand inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$4,000,000
Section 19.058. To the Department of Economic Development
For the planning, design, acquisition, and construction of public
infrastructure to support a regional athletics complex to be co-
located with an indoor athletics training facility located in a city
with more than three thousand eight hundred but fewer than four
thousand four hundred inhabitants and located in a county with
more than one hundred thousand but fewer than one hundred
twenty thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more
than four thousand but fewer than six thousand inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,500,000
Section 19.059. To the Department of Economic Development
For renovation and repairs at Jefferson Barracks Building 78
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$4,000,000

SS SCS HCS HB 2019 12
Section 19.060. To the Department of Economic Development
For capital improvements to support the history and art form of American
Jazz established in 1997 and located in any city with more than
four hundred thousand inhabitants and located in more than one
county
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$500,000
Section 19.061. To the Department of Economic Development
For the planning, design, renovation and construction of a parking garage
and convention center located in a city with more than forty
thousand but fewer than fifty-one thousand inhabitants and
partially located in a county with more than seventy thousand but
fewer than eighty thousand inhabitants, provided that no funds be
included for the planning, design, or construction of a hotel
From Missouri State Capitol Commission Capitol Preservation Fund
(1202) ...........................................................................................................$15,000,000
Section 19.070. To the Department of Natural Resources
For upgrades and maintenance to sewer systems in any city with more
than four hundred eighty but fewer than five hundred forty
inhabitants and located in a county with more than thirty
thousand but fewer than thirty-five thousand inhabitants and with
a county seat with more than two hundred but fewer than nine
hundred inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$2,000,000
Section 19.080. To the Department of Health and Senior Services
For a Federally Qualified Health Center founded in 1968 established as
the first federally recognized community health center in
Missouri, located in any city with more than four hundred
thousand inhabitants and located in more than one county, to
partner with institutions of higher education to sustain pediatric
behavioral health initiatives, provide preventive services for
pregnant individuals, and support community health workers in
care coordination and crisis prevention
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$700,000
Bill Totals
General Revenue Fund ...........................................................................................$103,110,095

SS SCS HCS HB 2019 13
Federal Funds .............................................................................................................37,000,000
Other Funds .......................................................................................................... 62,595,032
Total .......................................................................................................................$202,705,127
